Illinois, session 104th, HB4477.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Systems 5Act is amended by changing Sections 3.5, 3.35, 3.40, 3.45, and 63.50 as follows: 7    (210 ILCS 50/3.5)8    Sec. 3.5. Definitions. As used in this Act:9    "Clinical observation" means the ongoing observation of a 10patient's medical or mental health condition by a licensed 11health care professional utilizing a medical skill set while 12continuing assessment and care.13    "Department" means the Illinois Department of Public 14Health.15    "Digital license" means a secure electronic record of a 16license issued by the Department to EMS personnel that is 17accessible to EMS personnel through a Department-maintained or 18Department-approved electronic platform, website, or 19electronic application and is readily verifiable by Resource 20Hospitals and vehicle service providers. 21    "Director" means the Director of the Illinois Department 22of Public Health.23    "Emergency" means a medical condition of recent onset and   HB4477 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1severity that would lead a prudent layperson, possessing an 2average knowledge of medicine and health, to believe that 3urgent or unscheduled medical care is required.4    "Emergency Medical Services personnel" or "EMS personnel" 5means persons licensed as an Emergency Medical Responder (EMR) 6(First Responder), Emergency Medical Dispatcher (EMD), 7Emergency Medical Technician (EMT), Emergency Medical 8Technician-Intermediate (EMT-I), Advanced Emergency Medical 9Technician (A-EMT), Paramedic (EMT-P), Emergency 10Communications Registered Nurse (ECRN), Pre-Hospital 11Registered Nurse (PHRN), Pre-Hospital Advanced Practice 12Registered Nurse (PHAPRN), or Pre-Hospital Physician Assistant 13(PHPA).14    "Exclusive representative" has the same meaning as defined 15in Section 3 of the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 16    "Health care facility" means a hospital, nursing home, 17physician's office or other fixed location at which medical 18and health care services are performed. It does not include 19"pre-hospital emergency care settings" which utilize EMS 20personnel to render pre-hospital emergency care prior to the 21arrival of a transport vehicle, as defined in this Act.22    "Hospital" has the meaning ascribed to that term in the 23Hospital Licensing Act.24    "Just Culture" means a system approach to safety that 25promotes accountability through fair and consistent evaluation 26of conduct, distinguishing human error from at-risk and   HB4477 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1reckless behavior, and emphasizes learning, quality 2improvement, and system improvement over punitive action when 3appropriate.4    "Labor organization" has the same meaning as defined in 5Section 3 of the Illinois Public Labor Relations Act. 6    "Medical monitoring" means the performance of medical 7tests and physical exams to evaluate an individual's ongoing 8exposure to a factor that could negatively impact that 9person's health. "Medical monitoring" includes close 10surveillance or supervision of patients liable to suffer 11deterioration in physical or mental health and checks of 12various parameters such as pulse rate, temperature, 13respiration rate, the condition of the pupils, the level of 14consciousness and awareness, the degree of appreciation of 15pain, and blood gas concentrations such as oxygen and carbon 16dioxide.17    "NREMT" means the National Registry of Emergency Medical 18Technicians. 19    "Physical license" means the paper copy of the license 20issued by the Department to EMS personnel who have met the 21Department's education, training, and examination 22requirements.23    "Silver spanner program" means a program in which a member 24under a fire department's or fire protection district's 25collective bargaining agreement works on or at the EMS System 26under another fire department's or fire protection district's   HB4477 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1collective bargaining agreement and (i) the other fire 2department or fire protection district is not the member's 3full-time employer and (ii) any EMS services not included 4under the original fire department's or fire protection 5district's collective bargaining agreement are included in the 6other fire department's or fire protection district's 7collective bargaining agreement. 8    "Trauma" means any significant injury which involves 9single or multiple organ systems.10(Source: P.A. 103-521, eff. 1-1-24; 103-689, eff. 1-1-25; 11104-362, eff. 8-15-25.) 12    (210 ILCS 50/3.35)13    Sec. 3.35. Emergency Medical Services (EMS) Resource 14Hospital; Functions. The Resource Hospital of an EMS System 15shall:16        (a) Prepare a Program Plan in accordance with the 17    provisions of this Act and minimum standards and criteria 18    established in rules adopted by the Department pursuant to 19    this Act, and submit such Program Plan to the Department 20    for approval. The Department shall require each EMS System 21    to have a Department-approved policy regarding Just 22    Culture for evaluating and responding to human error, 23    at-risk, reckless behavior, or failures to perform 24    emergency and nonemergency medical services in accordance 25    with the defined scope of practice of the EMS personnel,   HB4477 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1    EMS System Program Plan, and rules established by the 2    Department. The Just Culture policy shall be used by the 3    EMS Medical Director when issuing EMS System discipline or 4    EMS System participation suspension. 5        (b) Appoint an EMS Medical Director, who will 6    continually monitor and supervise the System and who will 7    have the responsibility and authority for total management 8    of the System as delegated by the EMS Resource Hospital.9        The Program Plan shall require the EMS Medical 10    Director to appoint an alternate EMS Medical Director and 11    establish a written protocol addressing the functions to 12    be carried out in his or her absence.13        (c) Appoint an EMS System Coordinator and EMS 14    Administrative Director in consultation with the EMS 15    Medical Director and in accordance with rules adopted by 16    the Department pursuant to this Act.17        (d) Identify potential EMS System participants and 18    obtain commitments from them for the provision of 19    services.20        (e) Educate or coordinate the education of EMS 21    personnel and all other license holders in accordance with 22    the requirements of this Act, rules adopted by the 23    Department pursuant to this Act, and the EMS System 24    Program Plan. An EMS System may coordinate education 25    outside of the region of which it is located with valid 26    justification and Department approval. The didactic   HB4477 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1    portion of education may be conducted through an online 2    platform with EMS System and Department approval. An 3    education plan within a Resource Hospital may include 4    classes performed outside of the region in which the 5    Resource Hospital is located. When considering whether to 6    approve or deny an education plan for classes performed 7    outside of the region in which a Resource Hospital is 8    located, the Department shall give deference to the EMS 9    Medical Director's education plan request and shall not 10    unreasonably withhold approval. 11        (f) Notify the Department of EMS personnel who have 12    successfully completed the requirements as provided by law 13    for initial licensure, license renewal, and license 14    reinstatement by the Department.15        (g) Educate or coordinate the education of Emergency 16    Medical Dispatcher candidates, in accordance with the 17    requirements of this Act, rules adopted by the Department 18    pursuant to this Act, and the EMS System Program Plan.19        (h) Establish or approve protocols for prearrival 20    medical instructions to callers by System Emergency 21    Medical Dispatchers who provide such instructions.22        (i) Educate or coordinate the education of 23    Pre-Hospital Registered Nurse, Pre-Hospital Advanced 24    Practice Registered Nurse, Pre-Hospital Physician 25    Assistant, and ECRN candidates, in accordance with the 26    requirements of this Act, rules adopted by the Department   HB4477 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1    pursuant to this Act, and the EMS System Program Plan.2        (j) Approve Pre-Hospital Registered Nurse, 3    Pre-Hospital Advanced Practice Registered Nurse, 4    Pre-Hospital Physician Assistant, and ECRN candidates to 5    practice within the System, and reapprove Pre-Hospital 6    Registered Nurses, Pre-Hospital Advanced Practice 7    Registered Nurses, Pre-Hospital Physician Assistants, and 8    ECRNs every 4 years in accordance with the requirements of 9    the Department and the System Program Plan.10        (k) Establish protocols for the use of Pre-Hospital 11    Registered Nurses, Pre-Hospital Advanced Practice 12    Registered Nurses, and Pre-Hospital Physician Assistants 13    within the System.14        (l) Establish protocols for utilizing ECRNs and 15    physicians licensed to practice medicine in all of its 16    branches to monitor telecommunications from, and give 17    voice orders to, EMS personnel, under the authority of the 18    EMS Medical Director.19        (m) Monitor emergency and non-emergency medical 20    transports within the System, in accordance with rules 21    adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act.22        (n) Utilize levels of personnel required by the 23    Department to provide emergency care to the sick and 24    injured at the scene of an emergency, during transport to 25    a hospital or during inter-hospital transport and within 26    the hospital emergency department until the responsibility   HB4477 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1    for the care of the patient is assumed by the medical 2    personnel of a hospital emergency department or other 3    facility within the hospital to which the patient is first 4    delivered by System personnel.5        (o) Utilize levels of personnel required by the 6    Department to provide non-emergency medical services 7    during transport to a health care facility and within the 8    health care facility until the responsibility for the care 9    of the patient is assumed by the medical personnel of the 10    health care facility to which the patient is delivered by 11    System personnel.12        (p) Establish and implement a program for System 13    participant information and education, in accordance with 14    rules adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act.15        (q) Establish and implement a program for public 16    information and education, in accordance with rules 17    adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act.18        (r) Operate in compliance with the EMS Region Plan.19(Source: P.A. 103-689, eff. 1-1-25.) 20    (210 ILCS 50/3.40)21    Sec. 3.40. EMS System Participation Suspensions and Due 22Process.23    (a) An EMS Medical Director may suspend from participation 24within the System any EMS personnel, EMS Lead Instructor (LI), 25individual, individual provider, or other participant   HB4477 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1considered not to be meeting the requirements of the Program 2Plan of that approved EMS System. An EMS Medical Director must 3submit a suspension order to the Department describing which 4requirements of the Program Plan were not met and the 5suspension's duration. The Department shall review and confirm 6receipt of the suspension order, request additional 7information, or initiate an investigation. The Department 8shall incorporate the duration of that suspension into any 9further action taken by the Department to suspend, revoke, or 10refuse to issue or renew the license of the individual or 11entity for any violation of this Act or the Program Plan 12arising from the same conduct for which the suspension order 13was issued if the suspended party has neither requested a 14Department hearing on the suspension nor worked as a provider 15in any other System during the term of the suspension. 16    (b) Prior to suspending any individual or entity, an EMS 17Medical Director shall provide an opportunity for a hearing 18before the local System review board in accordance with 19subsection (f) and the rules promulgated by the Department. 20The local System review board shall have the authority to 21affirm, reduce, reverse, or modify, but not increase, the EMS 22Medical Director's suspension order. The local System review 23board shall consist of 3 members. One member shall be an 24emergency department physician with knowledge of EMS, and 2 25members shall be of the same professional category as the 26individual, individual provider, or other participant   HB4477 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1requesting the hearing. The EMS Medical Director shall 2establish, maintain, and post in a 24-hour accessible location 3a roster of pre-identified System review board members. The 4roster shall include multiple individuals representing each 5professional category operating within the EMS System, no less 6than 5 members. The roster shall be structured to ensure 7representation across the range of license types within the 8EMS System and support the selection of impartial and 9appropriately matched peers for each proceeding.10    The selection of the System review board members for a 11hearing shall be conducted by the EMS Medical Director or the 12EMS Medical Director's designee from the roster. Prior to 13finalizing the selection, the individual provider or 14participant requesting the hearing shall be provided the 15opportunity to review and approve the proposed review board 16members and provide any objections based on conflicts of 17interest or demonstrated bias. If the EMS Medical Director or 18the EMS Medical Director's designee and the EMS System 19participant or participating entity are unable to come to an 20agreement, the final decision shall be made by the Department. 21        (1) If the local System review board affirms, or 22    reduces, or modifies the EMS Medical Director's suspension 23    order, the individual or entity shall have the opportunity 24    for a review of the local board's decision by the State EMS 25    Disciplinary Review Board, pursuant to Section 3.45 of 26    this Act.  HB4477 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1        (2) If the local System review board reverses, or 2    reduces, or modifies the EMS Medical Director's suspension 3    order, the EMS Medical Director shall have the opportunity 4    for a review of the local board's decision by the State EMS 5    Disciplinary Review Board, pursuant to Section 3.45 of 6    this Act.7        (3) The suspension shall commence only upon the 8    occurrence of one of the following:9            (A) the individual or entity has waived the 10        opportunity for a hearing before the local System 11        review board;12            (B) the order has been affirmed, or reduced, or 13        modified by the local system review board and the 14        individual or entity has waived the opportunity for 15        review by the State Board; or16            (C) the order has been affirmed, or reduced, or 17        modified by the local system review board, and the 18        local board's decision has been affirmed, or reduced, 19        or modified by the State Board.20    (c) An individual interviewed or investigated by the local 21system review board or the Department shall have the right to a 22union representative and legal counsel of the individual's 23choosing present at any interview. The union representative 24must comply with any confidentiality requirements and 25requirements for the protection of any patient information 26presented during the proceeding.   HB4477 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1    (d) An EMS Medical Director may immediately suspend an 2EMR, EMD, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, Paramedic, ECRN, PHRN, LI, PHPA, 3PHAPRN, or other individual or entity if he or she finds that 4the continuation in practice by the individual or entity would 5constitute an imminent danger to the public. The suspended 6individual or entity shall be issued an immediate verbal 7notification followed by a written suspension order by the EMS 8Medical Director which states the length, terms, and basis for 9the suspension.10        (1) Within 24 hours following the commencement of the 11    suspension, the EMS Medical Director shall deliver to the 12    Department, by messenger, telefax, or other 13    Department-approved electronic communication, a copy of 14    the suspension order and copies of any written materials 15    which relate to the EMS Medical Director's decision to 16    suspend the individual or entity. All medical and 17    patient-specific information, including Department 18    findings with respect to the quality of care rendered, 19    shall be strictly confidential pursuant to the Medical 20    Studies Act (Part 21 of Article VIII of the Code of Civil 21    Procedure). 22        (2) Within 24 hours following the commencement of the 23    suspension, the suspended individual or entity may deliver 24    to the Department, by messenger, telefax, or other 25    Department-approved electronic communication, a written 26    response to the suspension order and copies of any written   HB4477 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1    materials which the individual or entity feels are 2    appropriate. All medical and patient-specific information, 3    including Department findings with respect to the quality 4    of care rendered, shall be strictly confidential pursuant 5    to the Medical Studies Act. 6        (3) Within 24 hours following receipt of the EMS 7    Medical Director's suspension order or the individual or 8    entity's written response, whichever is later, the 9    Director or the Director's designee shall determine 10    whether the suspension should be stayed pending an 11    opportunity for a hearing or review in accordance with 12    this Act, or whether the suspension should continue during 13    the course of that hearing or review. When an immediate 14    suspension order is not stayed, the Director or the 15    Director's designee within the Department shall identify 16    if that suspension shall immediately apply to statewide 17    participation only in situations when a licensee has been 18    charged with a crime while performing the licensee's 19    official duties as an EMR, EMD, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, 20    Paramedic, ECRN, TNS, PHRN, LI, PHPA, or PHAPRN and the 21    licensee's continuation to practice poses the possibility 22    of imminent harm to the public based upon factual evidence 23    provided to the Department. The determination to issue an 24    immediate statewide suspension shall not deny the right to 25    due process to a licensee. The Director or the Director's 26    designee shall issue this determination to the EMS Medical   HB4477 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1    Director, who shall immediately notify the suspended 2    individual or entity. The suspension shall remain in 3    effect during this period of review by the Director or the 4    Director's designee. 5    (e) Upon issuance of a suspension order for reasons 6directly related to medical care, the EMS Medical Director 7shall also provide the individual or entity with the 8opportunity for a hearing before the local System review 9board, in accordance with subsection (f) and the rules 10promulgated by the Department. The local System review board 11shall have the authority to affirm, reduce, reverse, or 12modify, but not increase, the EMS Medical Director's 13suspension order. 14        (1) If the local System review board affirms, or 15    reduces, or modifies the EMS Medical Director's suspension 16    order, the individual or entity shall have the opportunity 17    for a review of the local board's decision by the State EMS 18    Disciplinary Review Board, pursuant to Section 3.45 of 19    this Act.20        (2) If the local System review board reverses, or 21    reduces, or modifies the EMS Medical Director's suspension 22    order, the EMS Medical Director shall have the opportunity 23    for a review of the local board's decision by the State EMS 24    Disciplinary Review Board, pursuant to Section 3.45 of 25    this Act.26        (3) The suspended individual or entity may elect to   HB4477 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1    bypass the local System review board and seek direct 2    review of the EMS Medical Director's suspension order by 3    the State EMS Disciplinary Review Board.4    (f) The Resource Hospital shall designate a local System 5review board in accordance with the rules of the Department, 6for the purpose of providing a hearing to any individual or 7entity participating within the System who is suspended from 8participation by the EMS Medical Director. The EMS Medical 9Director shall arrange for a certified shorthand reporter to 10make a stenographic record of that hearing and thereafter 11prepare a transcript of the proceedings. The EMS Medical 12Director shall inform the individual of the individual's right 13to have a union representative and legal counsel of the 14individual's choosing present at any interview. The union 15representative must comply with any confidentiality 16requirements and requirements for the protection of any 17patient information presented during the proceeding. The 18transcript, all documents or materials received as evidence 19during the hearing and the local System review board's written 20decision shall be retained in the custody of the EMS system. 21The System shall implement a decision of the local System 22review board unless that decision has been appealed to the 23State Emergency Medical Services Disciplinary Review Board in 24accordance with this Act and the rules of the Department.25    (g) The Resource Hospital shall implement a decision of 26the State Emergency Medical Services Disciplinary Review Board   HB4477 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1which has been rendered in accordance with this Act and the 2rules of the Department.3(Source: P.A. 103-521, eff. 1-1-24; 103-779, eff. 8-2-24; 4104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 5    (210 ILCS 50/3.45)6    Sec. 3.45. State Emergency Medical Services Disciplinary 7Review Board.8    (a) The Governor shall appoint a State Emergency Medical 9Services Disciplinary Review Board, composed of an EMS Medical 10Director, an EMS System Coordinator, a Paramedic, an Emergency 11Medical Technician (EMT), and the following members, who shall 12only review cases in which a party is from the same 13professional category: a Pre-Hospital Registered Nurse, a 14Pre-Hospital Advanced Practice Registered Nurse, a 15Pre-Hospital Physician Assistant, an ECRN, a Trauma Nurse 16Specialist, an Emergency Medical Technician-Intermediate 17(EMT-I), an Advanced Emergency Medical Technician (A-EMT), a 18representative from a private vehicle service provider, a 19representative from a public vehicle service provider, and an 20emergency physician who monitors telecommunications from and 21gives voice orders to EMS personnel. The Governor shall also 22appoint one alternate for each member of the Board, from the 23same professional category as the member of the Board.24    (b) The members shall be appointed for a term of 3 years. 25All appointees shall serve until their successors are   HB4477 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1appointed. The alternate members shall be appointed and serve 2in the same fashion as the members of the Board. If a member 3resigns his or her appointment, the corresponding alternate 4shall serve the remainder of that member's term until a 5subsequent member is appointed by the Governor.6    (c) The function of the Board is to review and affirm, 7reduce, reverse, or modify, but not increase, disciplinary 8orders.9    (d) Any individual or entity, who received an immediate 10suspension from an EMS Medical Director may request the Board 11to reduce, reverse, or modify the suspension order. If the 12suspension had been affirmed, or reduced, or modified by a 13local System review board, the suspended individual or entity 14may request the Board to reduce, reverse, or modify the local 15board's decision.16    (e) Any individual or entity who received a non-immediate 17suspension order from an EMS Medical Director which was 18affirmed or modified by a local System review board may 19request the Board to reduce, reverse, or modify the local 20board's decision. The individual shall be informed of the 21individual's right to have one representative from the labor 22organization recognized as the exclusive representative of 23that individual's bargaining unit present and a legal 24representative present during the State Emergency Medical 25Services Disciplinary Review Board proceedings during open 26session. The labor organization's representative must also   HB4477 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1comply with all confidentiality requirements and requirements 2for the protection of any patient information presented during 3the proceeding. 4    (f) An EMS Medical Director whose suspension order was 5reduced, reversed, or modified by a local System review board 6may request the Board to reverse or modify the local board's 7decision.8    (g) The Board shall meet on the first Tuesday of every 9month, unless no requests for review have been submitted. 10Additional meetings of the Board shall be scheduled to ensure 11that a request for direct review of an immediate suspension 12order is scheduled within 14 days after the Department 13receives the request for review or as soon thereafter as a 14quorum is available. The Board shall meet in Springfield or 15Chicago, whichever location is closer to the majority of the 16members or alternates attending the meeting. The Department 17shall reimburse the members and alternates of the Board for 18reasonable travel expenses incurred in attending meetings of 19the Board.20    (h) A request for review shall be submitted in writing to 21the Chief of the Department's Division of Emergency Medical 22Services and Highway Safety, within 10 days after receiving 23the local board's decision or the EMS Medical Director's 24suspension order, whichever is applicable, a copy of which 25shall be enclosed.26    (i) At its regularly scheduled meetings, the Board shall   HB4477 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1review requests which have been received by the Department at 2least 10 working days prior to the Board's meeting date. 3Requests for review which are received less than 10 working 4days prior to a scheduled meeting shall be considered at the 5Board's next scheduled meeting, except that requests for 6direct review of an immediate suspension order may be 7scheduled up to 3 working days prior to the Board's meeting 8date.9    (j) A quorum shall be required for the Board to meet, which 10shall consist of 3 members or alternates, including the EMS 11Medical Director or alternate and the member or alternate from 12the same professional category as the subject of the 13suspension order. At each meeting of the Board, the members or 14alternates present shall select a Chairperson to conduct the 15meeting.16    (k) Deliberations for decisions of the State EMS 17Disciplinary Review Board shall be conducted in closed 18session. Department staff may attend for the purpose of 19providing clerical assistance, but no other persons may be in 20attendance except for the parties to the dispute being 21reviewed by the Board and their attorneys, unless by request 22of the Board.23    (l) The Board shall review the transcript, evidence, and 24written decision of the local review board, or the written 25decision and supporting documentation of the EMS Medical 26Director, whichever is applicable, along with any additional   HB4477 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1written or verbal testimony or argument offered by the parties 2to the dispute.3    (m) At the conclusion of its review, the Board shall issue 4its decision and the basis for its decision on a form provided 5by the Department, and shall submit to the Department its 6written decision together with the record of the local System 7review board. The Department shall promptly issue a copy of 8the Board's decision to all affected parties. The Board's 9decision shall be binding on all parties.10(Source: P.A. 103-521, eff. 1-1-24.) 11    (210 ILCS 50/3.50)12    Sec. 3.50. Emergency Medical Services personnel licensure 13levels. 14    (a) "Emergency Medical Technician" or "EMT" means a person 15who has successfully completed a course in basic life support 16as approved by the Department, is currently licensed by the 17Department in accordance with standards prescribed by this Act 18and rules adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act, and 19practices within an EMS System. A valid Emergency Medical 20Technician-Basic (EMT-B) license issued under this Act shall 21continue to be valid and shall be recognized as an Emergency 22Medical Technician (EMT) license until the Emergency Medical 23Technician-Basic (EMT-B) license expires. 24    (b) "Emergency Medical Technician-Intermediate" or "EMT-I" 25means a person who has successfully completed a course in   HB4477 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1intermediate life support as approved by the Department, is 2currently licensed by the Department in accordance with 3standards prescribed by this Act and rules adopted by the 4Department pursuant to this Act, and practices within an 5Intermediate or Advanced Life Support EMS System. 6    (b-5) "Advanced Emergency Medical Technician" or "A-EMT" 7means a person who has successfully completed a course in 8basic and limited advanced emergency medical care as approved 9by the Department, is currently licensed by the Department in 10accordance with standards prescribed by this Act and rules 11adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act, and practices 12within an Intermediate or Advanced Life Support EMS System. 13    (c) "Paramedic (EMT-P)" means a person who has 14successfully completed a course in advanced life support care 15as approved by the Department, is licensed by the Department 16in accordance with standards prescribed by this Act and rules 17adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act, and practices 18within an Advanced Life Support EMS System. A valid Emergency 19Medical Technician-Paramedic (EMT-P) license issued under this 20Act shall continue to be valid and shall be recognized as a 21Paramedic license until the Emergency Medical 22Technician-Paramedic (EMT-P) license expires. 23    (c-5) "Emergency Medical Responder" or "EMR (First 24Responder)" means a person who has successfully completed a 25course in emergency medical response as approved by the 26Department and provides emergency medical response services in   HB4477 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1accordance with the level of care established by the National 2EMS Educational Standards Emergency Medical Responder course 3as modified by the Department, or who provides services as 4part of an EMS System response plan, as approved by the 5Department, of that EMS System. The Department shall have the 6authority to adopt rules governing the curriculum, practice, 7and necessary equipment applicable to Emergency Medical 8Responders.9    On August 15, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 1098-973), a person who is licensed by the Department as a First 11Responder and has completed a Department-approved course in 12first responder defibrillator training based on, or equivalent 13to, the National EMS Educational Standards or other standards 14previously recognized by the Department shall be eligible for 15licensure as an Emergency Medical Responder upon meeting the 16licensure requirements and submitting an application to the 17Department. A valid First Responder license issued under this 18Act shall continue to be valid and shall be recognized as an 19Emergency Medical Responder license until the First Responder 20license expires.21    (c-10) All EMS Systems and licensees shall be fully 22compliant with the National EMS Education Standards, as 23modified by the Department in administrative rules, within 24 24months after the adoption of the administrative rules. 25    (d) The Department shall have the authority and 26responsibility to:  HB4477 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1        (1) Prescribe education and training requirements, 2    which includes training in the use of epinephrine, for all 3    levels of EMS personnel except for EMRs, based on the 4    National EMS Educational Standards and any modifications 5    to those curricula specified by the Department through 6    rules adopted pursuant to this Act.7            (A) A failure rate per course of 30% or greater at 8        the first attempt on the licensure examination shall 9        require the EMS System to submit a quality improvement 10        plan to the Department. The EMS System shall share 11        failure rates with the EMS Lead Instructor quarterly. 12        Neither the EMS System nor the Department may take 13        licensure action against an EMS Lead Instructor based 14        solely on first-attempt pass rates.15            (B) Candidates shall complete the licensure 16        examination within the timeline required by the NREMT. 17            (C) An accredited Paramedic program shall be 18        conducted only by an EMS System or an academic 19        institution whose curriculum has been approved by the 20        EMS System. An EMS System associate hospital may allow 21        students from an EMS System-approved and 22        Department-approved Paramedic course to complete 23        clinical rotations as approved by the EMS System 24        Medical Director. The approval by the EMS System 25        Medical Director may not be unreasonably denied.26        (2) Prescribe licensure testing requirements for all   HB4477 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1    levels of EMS personnel, which shall include a requirement 2    that all phases of instruction, training, and field 3    experience be completed before taking the appropriate 4    licensure examination. Candidates shall take the 5    appropriate National Registry examination. In prescribing 6    licensure testing requirements for honorably discharged 7    members of the armed forces of the United States under 8    this paragraph (2), the Department shall ensure that a 9    candidate's military emergency medical training, emergency 10    medical curriculum completed, and clinical experience, as 11    described in paragraph (2.5), are recognized. 12        (2.5) Review applications for EMS personnel licensure 13    from honorably discharged members of the armed forces of 14    the United States with military emergency medical 15    training. Applications shall be filed with the Department 16    within one year after military discharge and shall 17    contain: (i) proof of successful completion of military 18    emergency medical training; (ii) a detailed description of 19    the emergency medical curriculum completed; and (iii) a 20    detailed description of the applicant's clinical 21    experience. The Department may request additional and 22    clarifying information. The Department shall evaluate the 23    application, including the applicant's training and 24    experience, consistent with the standards set forth under 25    subsections (a), (b), (c), and (d) of Section 3.10. If the 26    application clearly demonstrates that the training and   HB4477 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1    experience meet such standards, the Department shall offer 2    the applicant the opportunity to successfully complete a 3    Department-approved EMS personnel examination for the 4    level of license for which the applicant is qualified. 5    Upon passage of an examination, the Department shall issue 6    a license, which shall be subject to all provisions of 7    this Act that are otherwise applicable to the level of EMS 8    personnel license issued. 9        (3) License individuals as an EMR, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, 10    or Paramedic who have met the Department's education, 11    training and examination requirements.12            (A) The Department shall issue to EMS personnel a 13        physical license or digital license.14            (B) A licensee shall not be required to possess a 15        copy of a physical license or a digital license on the 16        licensee's person while on duty. 17        (4) Prescribe annual continuing education and 18    relicensure requirements for all EMS personnel licensure 19    levels. 20        (5) Relicense individuals as an EMD, EMR, EMT, EMT-I, 21    A-EMT, PHRN, PHAPRN, PHPA, or Paramedic every 4 years, 22    based on their compliance with continuing education and 23    relicensure requirements as required by the Department 24    pursuant to this Act. Every 4 years, a Paramedic shall 25    have 100 hours of approved continuing education, an EMT-I 26    and an advanced EMT shall have 80 hours of approved   HB4477 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1    continuing education, and an EMT shall have 60 hours of 2    approved continuing education. An Illinois licensed EMR, 3    EMD, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, Paramedic, ECRN, PHPA, PHAPRN, or 4    PHRN whose license has been expired for less than 36 5    months may apply for reinstatement by the Department. 6    Reinstatement shall require that the applicant (i) submit 7    satisfactory proof of completion of continuing medical 8    education and clinical requirements to be prescribed by 9    the Department in an administrative rule; (ii) submit a 10    positive recommendation from an Illinois EMS Medical 11    Director attesting to the applicant's qualifications for 12    retesting; and (iii) pass a Department approved test for 13    the level of EMS personnel license sought to be 14    reinstated.15        (6) Grant inactive status to any EMR, EMD, EMT, EMT-I, 16    A-EMT, Paramedic, ECRN, PHAPRN, PHPA, or PHRN who 17    qualifies, based on standards and procedures established 18    by the Department in rules adopted pursuant to this Act.19        (7) Charge a fee for EMS personnel examination, 20    licensure, and license renewal.21        (8) Suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew the 22    license of any licensee, after an opportunity for an 23    impartial hearing before a neutral administrative law 24    judge appointed by the Director, where the preponderance 25    of the evidence shows one or more of the following:26            (A) The licensee has not met continuing education   HB4477 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1        or relicensure requirements as prescribed by the 2        Department;3            (B) The licensee has failed to maintain 4        proficiency in the level of skills for which he or she 5        is licensed;6            (C) The licensee, during the provision of medical 7        services, engaged in dishonorable, unethical, or 8        unprofessional conduct of a character likely to 9        deceive, defraud, or harm the public;10            (D) The licensee has failed to maintain or has 11        violated standards of performance and conduct as 12        prescribed by the Department in rules adopted pursuant 13        to this Act or his or her EMS System's Program Plan;14            (E) The licensee is physically impaired to the 15        extent that he or she cannot physically perform the 16        skills and functions for which he or she is licensed, 17        as verified by a physician, unless the person is on 18        inactive status pursuant to Department regulations;19            (F) The licensee is mentally impaired to the 20        extent that he or she cannot exercise the appropriate 21        judgment, skill and safety for performing the 22        functions for which he or she is licensed, as verified 23        by a physician, unless the person is on inactive 24        status pursuant to Department regulations;25            (G) The licensee has violated this Act or any rule 26        adopted by the Department pursuant to this Act; or  HB4477 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1            (H) The licensee has been convicted (or entered a 2        plea of guilty or nolo contendere) by a court of 3        competent jurisdiction of a Class X, Class 1, or Class 4        2 felony in this State or an out-of-state equivalent 5        offense. 6        (9) Prescribe education and training requirements in 7    the administration and use of opioid antagonists for all 8    levels of EMS personnel based on the National EMS 9    Educational Standards and any modifications to those 10    curricula specified by the Department through rules 11    adopted pursuant to this Act. 12    (d-5) An EMR, EMD, EMT, EMT-I, A-EMT, Paramedic, ECRN, 13PHAPRN, PHPA, or PHRN who is a member of the Illinois National 14Guard or an Illinois State Trooper or who exclusively serves 15as a volunteer for units of local government with a population 16base of less than 5,000 or as a volunteer for a not-for-profit 17organization that serves a service area with a population base 18of less than 5,000 may submit an application to the Department 19for a waiver of the fees described under paragraph (7) of 20subsection (d) of this Section on a form prescribed by the 21Department. 22    (d-10) A person who is not an EMS personnel may operate an 23EMS vehicle pursuant to this Act if the following requirements 24are met: (i) the person meets the requirements of Section 2511-1421 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; (ii) 2 26Department-licensed EMS personnel are present and have met   HB4477 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1educational requirements prescribed by the Department; and 2(iii) the clinical condition of the patient necessitates the 3involvement of additional licensed personnel to ensure 4appropriate assessment, treatment, and patient safety. If a 5waiver is issued by the Department, the person who is not an 6EMS personnel may operate the EMS vehicle if only one EMS 7personnel is present. Upon request, the Department may issue a 8retroactive waiver when appropriate. 9    The education requirements prescribed by the Department 10under this Section must allow for the suspension of those 11requirements in the case of a member of the armed services or 12reserve forces of the United States or a member of the Illinois 13National Guard who is on active duty pursuant to an executive 14order of the President of the United States, an act of the 15Congress of the United States, or an order of the Governor at 16the time that the member would otherwise be required to 17fulfill a particular education requirement. Such a person must 18fulfill the education requirement within 6 months after his or 19her release from active duty. 20    (e) In the event that any rule of the Department or an EMS 21Medical Director that requires testing for drug use as a 22condition of the applicable EMS personnel license conflicts 23with or duplicates a provision of a collective bargaining 24agreement that requires testing for drug use, that rule shall 25not apply to any person covered by the collective bargaining 26agreement.  HB4477 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 17768 BAB 31200 b1    (f) At the time of applying for or renewing his or her 2license, an applicant for a license or license renewal may 3submit an email address to the Department. The Department 4shall keep the email address on file as a form of contact for 5the individual. The Department shall send license renewal 6notices electronically and by mail to a licensee who provides 7the Department with his or her email address. The notices 8shall be sent at least 60 days prior to the expiration date of 9the license. 10(Source: P.A. 104-362, eff. 8-15-25.)